waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SFX Q ias     esnioji         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniosios       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniajai        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniąją         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniąja         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniojoj        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniojoje       [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesnioji        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniosios      čias
SFX Q čias    tesniajai       čias
SFX Q čias    tesniąją        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniąja        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniojoj       čias
SFX Q čias    tesniojoje      čias
SFX Q us      esnioji         us
SFX Q us      esniosios       us
SFX Q us      esniajai        us
SFX Q us      esniąją         us
SFX Q us      esniąja         us
SFX Q us      esniojoj        us
SFX Q us      esniojoje       us
SFX Q as      esnieji         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniųjų         [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniesiems      [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuosius      [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniaisiais     [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniuosiuose    [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esnieji         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniųjų         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniesiems      [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuosius      [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniaisiais     [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniuosiuose    [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesnieji        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniųjų        čias
SFX Q čias    tesniesiems     čias
SFX Q čias    tesniuosius     čias
SFX Q čias    tesniaisiais    čias
SFX Q čias    tesniuosiuose   čias
SFX Q us      esnieji         us
SFX Q us      esniųjų         us
SFX Q us      esniesiems      us
SFX Q us      esniuosius      us
SFX Q us      esniaisiais     us
SFX Q us      esniuosiuose    us
SFX Q as      esniosioms      [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniąsias       [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniosiomis     [^i]as
SFX Q as      esniosiose      [^i]as
SFX Q ias     esniosioms      [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniąsias       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniosiomis     [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     esniosiose      [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tesniosioms     čias
SFX Q čias    tesniąsias      čias
SFX Q čias    tesniosiomis    čias
SFX Q čias    tesniosiose     čias
SFX Q us      esniosioms      us
SFX Q us      esniąsias       us
SFX Q us      esniosiomis     us
SFX Q us      esniosiose      us
SFX Q as      ėlesnis         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnio         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniam        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnį          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniu         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniame       [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesnis         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnio         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniam        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnį          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniu         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniame       [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnis        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnio        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniam       čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnį         čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniu        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniame      čias
SFX Q us      ėlesnis         us
SFX Q us      ėlesnio         us
SFX Q us      ėlesniam        us
SFX Q us      ėlesnį          us
SFX Q us      ėlesniu         us
SFX Q us      ėlesniame       us
SFX Q as      ėlesnė          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnės         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnei         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnę          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesne          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnėje        [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesnė          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnės         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnei         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnę          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesne          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnėje        [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnė         čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnės        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnei        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnę         čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesne         čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnėje       čias
SFX Q us      ėlesnė          us
SFX Q us      ėlesnės         us
SFX Q us      ėlesnei         us
SFX Q us      ėlesnę          us
SFX Q us      ėlesne          us
SFX Q us      ėlesnėje        us
SFX Q as      ėlesni          [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnių         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniems       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnius        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniais       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniuose      [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesni          [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnių         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniems       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnius        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniais       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniuose      [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesni         čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnių        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniems      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnius       čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniais      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniuose     čias
SFX Q us      ėlesni          us
SFX Q us      ėlesnių         us
SFX Q us      ėlesniems       us
SFX Q us      ėlesnius        us
SFX Q us      ėlesniais       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniuose      us
SFX Q as      ėlesnėms        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnes         [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnėmis       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnėse        [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesnėms        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnes         [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnėmis       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnėse        [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnėms       čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnes        čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnėmis      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnėse       čias
SFX Q us      ėlesnėms        us
SFX Q us      ėlesnes         us
SFX Q us      ėlesnėmis       us
SFX Q us      ėlesnėse        us
SFX Q as      ėlesnysis       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniojo       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniajam      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesnįjį        [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniuoju      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniajame     [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesnysis       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniojo       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniajam      [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesnįjį        [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniuoju      [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniajame     [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnysis      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniojo      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniajam     čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnįjį       čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniuoju     čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniajame    čias
SFX Q us      ėlesnysis       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniojo       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniajam      us
SFX Q us      ėlesnįjį        us
SFX Q us      ėlesniuoju      us
SFX Q us      ėlesniajame     us
SFX Q as      ėlesnioji       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniosios     [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniajai      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniąją       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniąja       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniojoj      [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniojoje     [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesnioji       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniosios     [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniajai      [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniąją       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniąja       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniojoje     [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniojoj      [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnioji      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniosios    čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniajai     čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniąją      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniąja      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniojoje    čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniojoj     čias
SFX Q us      ėlesnioji       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniosios     us
SFX Q us      ėlesniajai      us
SFX Q us      ėlesniąją       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniąja       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniojoje     us
SFX Q us      ėlesniojoj      us
SFX Q as      ėlesnieji       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniųjų       [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniesiems    [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniuosius    [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniaisiais   [^i]as
SFX Q as      ėlesniuosiuose  [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ėlesnieji       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniųjų       [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniesiems    [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniuosius    [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniaisiais   [^č]ias
SFX Q ias     ėlesniuosiuose  [^č]ias
SFX Q čias    tėlesnieji      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniųjų      čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniesiems   čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniuosius   čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniaisiais  čias
SFX Q čias    tėlesniuosiuose čias
SFX Q us      ėlesnieji       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniųjų       us
SFX Q us      ėlesniesiems    us
SFX Q us      ėlesniuosius    us
