waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.dic
abuojas/BNQ
aidingas/BNQ
aižus/BNQ
aklinas/BNQ
aktyvus/BNQ
alegoriškas/BNQ
alternatyvus/BQ
amerikoniškas/BNQ
angeliškas/BNQ
ankštas/BNQ
antiislamiškas/BNQ
apdarus/BNQ
apkantus/BNQ
apstus/BNQ
apčiuopiamas/BNQ
argentinietiškas/BNQ
aršus/BNQ
atdaras/BNQ
atitinkamas/BNQ
atlašus/BNQ
atrankus/BNQ
atsparus/BNQ
atšaižus/BNQ
audrotas/BNQ
aukštielninkas/BNQ
autoritetingas/BNQ
aštrus/BNQ
baisus/BNQ
baltiškas/BNQ
barstus/BNQ
bavariškas/BNQ
benzinuotas/BNQ
beteisiškas/BNQ
biznas/BNQ
blausus/BNQ
bosniškas/BNQ
brizgus/BNQ
bukaprotiškas/BNQ
bėglus/BNQ
choleriškas/BNQ
cypus/BNQ
dainingas/BNQ
dantingas/BNQ
dargus/BNQ
daugiareikšmiškas/BNQ
dedervinėtas/BNQ
demagogiškas/BNQ
desperatiškas/BNQ
diametralus/BNQ
dilgus/BNQ
disciplinuotas/BNQ
doras/BNQ
dramatiškas/BNQ
drausmingas/BNQ
drugiškas/BNQ
druskėtas/BNQ
drėgnas/BNQ
dulkus/BNQ
duoninas/BNQ
dusnus/BNQ
dvidešimteriopas/BNQ
dvylas/BNQ
dėmėtas/BNQ
džiugus/BNQ
egzotiškas/BNQ
ekscentriškas/BNQ
ekvivalentus/BNQ
emocingas/BNQ
epopėjiškas/BNQ
esmingas/BNQ
faktiškas/BNQ
fenomenalus/BNQ
fotogeniškas/BNQ
gailus/BNQ
gaišus/BNQ
galvingas/BNQ
garbiniuotas/BNQ
gaubtas/BNQ
geidulingas/BNQ
geluoniuotas/BNQ
gerklingas/BNQ
gimtas/BNQ
gižus/BNQ
glitus/BNQ
gniužus/BNQ
grabštus/BNQ
gramzdus/BNQ
greitas/BNQ
griovėtas/BNQ
grublus/BNQ
grėsmingas/BNQ
gurguluotas/BNQ
gyvatiškas/BNQ
gėlas/BNQ
higieniškas/BNQ
ilgaamžiškas/BNQ
impozantiškas/BNQ
infantilus/BNQ
interaktyvus/BNQ
islamiškas/BNQ
išdavikiškas/BNQ
iširas/BNQ
išlaidingas/BNQ
išoriškas/BNQ
ištaigingas/BNQ
išvirkščias/BNQ
jaunatviškas/BNQ
judrus/BNQ
juokingas/BNQ
jūsiškas/BNQ
kaitringas/BNQ
kalkingas/BNQ
kalviškas/BNQ
kamšus/BNQ
kapitališkas/BNQ
karpytas/BNQ
kasotas/BNQ
kaulingas/BNQ
kekėtas/BNQ
keltas/BNQ
kertėtas/BNQ
keturšakas/BNQ
kiesvas/BNQ
kiminuotas/BNQ
kiršus/BNQ
klampus/BNQ
klibas/BNQ
klumpėtas/BNQ
knislus/BNQ
kolektyviškas/BNQ
komplikuotas/BNQ
konservatyvus/BNQ
koriuotas/BNQ
košmariškas/BQ
kraujingas/BNQ
kremzlėtas/BNQ
kroatiškas/BNQ
kryžiškas/BNQ
kunigiškas/BNQ
kurdiškas/BNQ
kvapingas/BNQ
kūliavirsčias/BNQ
laibas/BNQ
laiptuotas/BNQ
lakingas/BNQ
lankstus/BNQ
lašiningas/BNQ
leistinas/BNQ
lesus/BNQ
liemeningas/BNQ
ligūstas/BNQ
literatūriškas/BNQ
logiškas/BNQ
lukštuotas/BNQ
lygiateisiškas/BNQ
lėtas/BNQ
maišus/BNQ
malžus/BNQ
marginiuotas/BNQ
masyvus/BNQ
mauriškas/BNQ
mediciniškas/BNQ
meksikietiškas/BNQ
menkas/BNQ
mezginiuotas/BNQ
miesčioniškas/BNQ
miltuotas/BNQ
mirtinas/BNQ
mobilus/BNQ
mokslus/BNQ
monotoniškas/BNQ
muilingas/BNQ
muzikalus/BNQ
mėnesėtas/BNQ
mūsuotas/BNQ
nakvinas/BNQ
neatskiriamas/BNQ
nenukrypstamas/BNQ
neutralus/BNQ
niurgzlus/BNQ
numirėliškas/BNQ
nuolinkas/BNQ
nuožmus/BNQ
opėtas/BNQ
padūkiškas/BNQ
painus/BNQ
paklusnus/BNQ
panašus/BNQ
partizaniškas/BNQ
pasiutiškas/BNQ
patenkinamas/BNQ
pavasariškas/BNQ
pašauktas/BNQ
penkeriopas/BNQ
petingas/BNQ
pilietiškas/BNQ
pjūkliškas/BNQ
plokščias/BNQ
politiškas/BNQ
pragmatiškas/BNQ
prancūziškas/BNQ
pražulnus/BNQ
prierangus/BNQ
priklausomas/BNQ
produktyvus/BNQ
prūsiškas/BNQ
pusnėtas/BNQ
pūliuotas/BNQ
raiškingas/BNQ
raukšlėtas/BNQ
regresyvus/BNQ
reprezentatyvus/BNQ
rimtas/BNQ
rožėtas/BNQ
rytietiškas/BNQ
rūšingas/BNQ
samanotas/BNQ
saulėtas/BNQ
savitarpiškas/BNQ
senatviškas/BNQ
sibiriškas/BNQ
simpatiškas/BNQ
skalnas/BNQ
skersuotas/BNQ
skraubus/BNQ
skystimingas/BNQ
slovėniškas/BNQ
smigus/BNQ
snapuotas/BNQ
sopuliuotas/BNQ
spirituotas/BNQ
spyruokliškas/BNQ
staliniškas/BNQ
stichiškas/BNQ
strėliškas/BNQ
suodinas/BNQ
svajus/BNQ
sąlygiškas/BNQ
taktiškas/BNQ
tarnybiškas/BNQ
techniškas/BNQ
teplus/BNQ
tikėtas/BNQ
toliaregiškas/BNQ
trauklus/BNQ
triūslus/BNQ
tulžus/BNQ
tviskus/BNQ
ukrainietiškas/BNQ
uoslingas/BNQ
užgaulingas/BNQ
vaidingas/BNQ
vaišus/BNQ
valkšnus/BNQ
varingas/BNQ
vaškuotas/BNQ
veleniškas/BNQ
verpstiškas/BNQ
vežikiškas/BNQ
vienišas/BNQ
vikrus/BNQ
virbiškas/BNQ
vitaminingas/BNQ
vyšniuotas/BNQ
vėžiškas/BNQ
čirškus/BNQ
įkalnus/BNQ
įsakmus/BNQ
įtariamas/BNQ
įširdus/BNQ
šalnotas/BNQ
šeringas/BNQ
šieninas/BNQ
šiurkštus/BNQ
šmukštus/BNQ
švediškas/BNQ
šėmmargas/BNQ
žaibiškas/BNQ
žavingas/BNQ
žiburiuotas/BNQ
žiūrus/BNQ
žvaigždėtas/BNQ
žvyringas/BNQ
